zh-CN: 高尔夫球型: 二层球; Straight Distance; Tour Performance; Tour 系列; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de bola de golfe: Curta distância; Distância reta; Desempenho ao vivo; Valor ao vivo; Outro
th: ประเภทของลูกกอล์ฟ: รุ่นซอฟท์ดิสแทนซ์; รุ่นสเตรทดิสแทนซ์; ประสิทธิภาพระดับทัวร์นาเมนท์; คุณค่าระดับทัวร์นาเมนท์; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 高爾夫球類型: 軟式高爾夫球; 直線距離; 巡迴表演; 旅遊價值; 其他
el: Τύπος σε μπαλάκια του γκολφ: Soft distance; Straight distance; Tour performance; Tour value; Άλλο
hr-HR: Vrsta loptice za golf: Meka udaljenost; Ravna udaljenost; Performansa ture; Vrijednost ture; Ostalo
fr: Type de balle de golf: Distance douce; Distance droite; Performance tour; Valeur du voyage; Autre
ja: ゴルフボールの種類: ソフトディスタンス; ストレートディスタンス; ツアーパフォーマンス; ツアーバリュー; その他
sv: Typ av golfboll: Mjuk distans; Rakt avstånd; Tourprestanda; Tour value; Övrigt
ro-RO: Tip minge de golf: Soft distance; Straight distance; Tour performance; Tour value; Altele
bg-BG: Тип топка за голф: Меко разстояние; Пряко разстояние; Представяне на обиколка; Стойност на обиколка; Други
cs: Typ golfového míčku: Soft distance; Straight distance; Tour performance; Tour value; Jiné
da: Golfboldtype: Blød afstand; Lige afstand; Tour præstation; Tour værdi; Andet
vi: Loại bóng golf: Khoảng cách mềm; Khoảng cách thẳng; Hiệu suất đường đi; Giá trị đường đi; Khác
ru: Тип мяча для гольфа: Мягкая дистанция; Расстояние по прямой; Показатели тура; Стоимость тура; Другое
en: Golf ball type: Soft distance; Straight distance; Tour performance; Tour value; Other
sl-SI: Vrsta žogice za golf: Na daljavo, mehka; Na daljavo, naravnost; Profesionalne; Ugodne profesionalne; Drugo
sk-SK: Typ golfovej loptičky: Soft distance; Straight distance; Tour performance; Tour value; Iné
es: Tipo de pelota de golf: De distancia suave; De distancia recta; Rendimiento de gira; Valor de gira; Otros
ko: 골프공 유형: 소프트 디스턴스; 직선 거리; 투어 공연; 투어 가치; 기타
nb: Golfballtype: Myk avstand; Rett avstand; Turneringsprestasjon; Turneringsverdi; Annet
fi: Golfpallokotelo: Lyhyt etäisyys; Suora etäisyys; Tour performance; Tour value; Muu
hu: Golflabda típusa: Soft distance; Straight distance; Tour performance; Tour value; Egyéb
tr: Golf topu tipi: Yumuşak mesafe; Düz mesafe; Tur performansı; Tur değeri; Diğer
pt-BR: Tipo de bola de golfe: Soft distance; Straight distance; Tour performance; Tour value; Outro
it: Tipo di pallina da golf: Distanza soft; Distanza dritta; Performance del giro; Valore del giro; Altro
pl: Typ piłki golfowej: Soft distance; Straight distance; Tour performance; Tour value; Inne
de: Golfballtyp: Weicher Distanzball; Gerade Distanz; Tour Performance; Tour Value; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Golfo kamuoliuko tipas: Minkštas; Tiesaus atstumo; Aukščiausios kokybės; Geriausias kainos ir kokybės santykis; Kita
nl: Type golfbal: Zachte afstand; Rechte afstand; Tourprestaties; Tourwaarde; Andere